Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.170

Inspector of funeral establishments, crematories, alkaline hydrolysis, natural organic reduction facilities, directors, and embalmers—Appointment—Eligibility—Term—Powers and duties.

The director must appoint an agent whose title is "inspector of funeral establishments, crematories, alkaline hydrolysis, and natural organic reduction facilities, funeral directors, and embalmers of the state of Washington." A person is not eligible for such appointment unless he or she has been a licensed funeral director and embalmer in the state of Washington, with a minimum experience of not less than five consecutive years.

(1) The inspector must:

(a) Serve at the pleasure of the director; and

(b) At all times be under the supervision of the director.

(2) The inspector is authorized to:

(a) Enter the office, premises, establishment, or place of business, where funeral directing, embalming, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural organic reduction is carried on for the purpose of inspecting the premises;

(b) Inspect the licenses and registrations of funeral directors, embalmers, funeral director interns, and embalmer interns;

(c) Serve and execute any papers or process issued by the director under authority of this chapter; and

(d) Perform any other duty or duties prescribed or ordered by the director.

[ 2019 c 432 s 37; 2005 c 365 s 12; 1937 c 108 s 16; RRS s 8325-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 432: See note following RCW 68.05.175.